Tennessee, session 114, HB2041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 29, Chapter 18, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "participant in an eviction process" means a private
entity or person who is serving civil process related to an eviction proceeding or a
person affiliated with a private entity or person who is serving civil process related to an
eviction proceeding, and does not include a law enforcement officer serving civil process
related to an eviction proceeding while engaged in the law enforcement officer's official
duties.
(b) Notwithstanding title 39, chapter 13, part 6 to the contrary and unless
authorized by a court order, a participant in an eviction process is prohibited from
publishing, transmitting, or broadcasting, in real-time or near real-time, any video of the
service of civil process upon an individual without the express written permission of the
individual.
(c)
(1) An individual who is a victim of a violation of subsection (b) has a
private right of action against a person violating this section.
(2) A court may award a victim of a violation of subsection (b) who
prevails in an action under this subsection (c):
(A) A minimum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in
statutory damages per intentional violation of subsection (b);
HB2041
009749
- 1 -

(B) Actual damages;
(C) Punitive damages, pursuant to § 29-39-104;
(D) Other forms of equitable relief; and
(E) Reasonable costs and attorney fees.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009749